New York, session 2025-2026, S4119.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (i) of section 3216 of the insurance law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph 40 to read as follows: 3 (40) (A) Every policy which provides medical, major medical, or simi- 4 lar comprehensive-type coverage shall provide coverage for electrolysis 5 procedures to stop the growth of hair, when determined medically neces- 6 sary, including but not limited to instances necessary for gender-af- 7 firming treatment. 8 (B) Coverage provided under this paragraph may be subject to annual 9 deductibles and co-insurance as deemed appropriate by the superinten- 10 dent. 11 § 2. Subsection (k) of section 3221 of the insurance law is amended by 12 adding a new paragraph 24 to read as follows: 13 (24) (A) Every group or blanket policy delivered or issued for deliv- 14 ery in this state which provides medical, major medical, or similar 15 comprehensive-type coverage shall provide coverage for electrolysis 16 procedures to stop the growth of hair, when determined medically neces- 17 sary, including but not limited to instances necessary for gender-af- 18 firming treatment. 19 (B) Coverage provided under this paragraph may be subject to annual 20 deductibles and co-insurance as deemed appropriate by the superinten- 21 dent. 22 § 3. Section 4303 of the insurance law is amended by adding a new 23 subsection (ww) to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08339-01-5 S. 4119 2 1 (ww) (1) Every contract issued by a medical expense indemnity corpo- 2 ration, hospital service corporation or health service corporation that 3 provides medical, major medical, or similar comprehensive-type coverage 4 shall provide coverage for electrolysis procedures to stop the growth of 5 hair, when determined medically necessary, including but not limited to 6 instances necessary for gender-affirming treatment. 7 (2) Coverage provided under this subsection may be subject to annual 8 deductibles and co-insurance as deemed appropriate by the superinten- 9 dent. 10 § 4. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 11 have become a law and shall apply to any policy issued, renewed, modi- 12 fied, altered, or amended on or after such effective date.